Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.293

Fishing derbies exempted.

Any fishing derby, defined under RCW 9.46.0229, shall not be subject to any other provisions of this chapter or to any rules or regulations of the commission.

[ 1989 c 8 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 166 s 13.]

NOTES:

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 166: See note following RCW 9.46.090.